Utah statutes.
17-22-1.   "Process," "notice," defined.
"Process" as used in this chapter includes all writs, warrants, summonses and
orders of the courts of justice or judicial officers. "Notice" includes all
papers and orders, except process, required to be served in any proceeding
before any court, board, commission or officer, or when required by law to be
served independently of such proceedings.
